Utah statutes.
77-32-303.   Standard for court to appoint noncontracting attorney or
defense resource -- Hearing.
If a county or municipality has contracted for, or otherwise made arrangements
for, the legal defense of indigents, including a competent attorney and
defense resources, the court may not appoint a noncontracting attorney or
resource either under this part, Section 78B-1-151, or Rule 15, Utah Rules of
Criminal Procedure, unless the court:
(1)  conducts a hearing with proper notice to the responsible entity to
consider the authorization or designation of a noncontract attorney or
resource; and
(2)  makes a finding that there is a compelling reason to authorize or
designate a noncontracting attorney or resources for the indigent defendant.
